District of Columbia statutes.
3-1327

Suppliers’ price list; fees; financial responsibility bonds; maintenance of books and records.

Each application for a suppliers’ license, or renewal thereof, shall be accompanied by a certified copy of the price list of the applicant’s bingo supplies and equipment, a fee, and a financial responsibility bond. Said fees and financial responsibility bonds shall be set by the Board. Each licensed supplier shall maintain books and records in such manner as to enable the Board to determine the gross sales of bingo supplies and equipment.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
1981 Ed., § 2-2527.